Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1524
Revenue refunding bonds; authorized.

For the purpose of refunding any revenue bonds which may have been issued and are outstanding, the respective boards may issue revenue refunding bonds in the same manner as provided in sections 85-1520 to 85-1527 for the issuance of revenue bonds.

Laws 1987, LB 329, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 79-2650.12;

Laws 1993, LB 239, § 46.